Maine, session 132, LD1773.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §363, sub-§2 is enacted to read:
2. As used in this section, "retail merchandise" means any product, good or other item
of value that is displayed, held, stored or offered by a retailer for retail sale to consumers.
"Retail merchandise" includes, but is not limited to, tangible personal property, gift cards,
electronics and commodities.
Page 1 - 132LR1111(03)